District of Columbia statutes.
1-618.03

Repealed

Ethics counselors; codification of advisory opinions.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1803, 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-58, § 3, 27 DCR 963
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(z), 33 DCR 7241
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(y), 43 DCR 2978
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(c)(5), 59 DCR 1862

Repeal of § 3 of Law 6-177: Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 provided that the provisions of § 3 are repealed on the 1st day following the 36-month period after February 24, 1987.

Repeal of § 4(b) of Law 6-177: Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 8-74, effective March 15, 1990, provided that § 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 is repealed.

Section 601(k) of D.C. Law 19-124 provided: “(k) Title V shall apply as of the effective date of this act, except that § 501(c)(5) shall apply as of October 1, 2012.”

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(c)(5) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).
1973 Ed., § 1-348.3.
1981 Ed., § 1-619.3.